bn_BD/bn_IN.aff
SFX	v	নো	লে/ZXi	নো		"ঘুমালে"	তুমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	া	ল/wX		[^য়]া	"জানল"	সে	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	য়া	ল/xX		[^ও]য়া 	"চুল"		সে	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	ল/εX		ওয়া		"খেল"		সে	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	নো	ল/ZX		নো		"ঘুমাল"	সে	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	া	লো/wX	[^য়]া	"জানলো"	সে	চলিত		past simple alt ???
SFX	v	য়া	লো/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুলো"		সে	চলিত		past simple alt ???
SFX	v	ওয়া	লো/εX	ওয়া		"খেলো"	সে	চলিত		past simple alt ???
SFX	v	নো	লো/ZX	নো		"ঘুমালো"	সে	চলিত		past simple alt ???
SFX	v	া	লেন/wX	[^য়]া	"জানলেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	য়া	লেন/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুলেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	লেন/εX	ওয়া		"খেলেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	নো	লেন/ZX	নো		"ঘুমালেন"	তুমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	া	িলাম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিলাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	া	িলাম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিলাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	া	িলাম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিলাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	য়া	ইলাম/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুইলাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	লাম/βX	ওয়া		"খাইলাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	নো	ইলাম/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইলাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	া	িলি/wX 	[^য়]া	"জানিলি"	তুই	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	য়া	ইলি/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুইলি"	তুই	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	লি/βX		ওয়া		"খাইলি"	তুই	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	নো	ইলি/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইলি"	তুই	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	া	িলে/wXi	[^য়]া	"জানিলে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	য়া	ইলে/xXi	[^ও]য়া 	"চুইলে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	লে/βXi	ওয়া		"খাইলে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	নো	ইলে/OXi	নো		"ঘুমাইলে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	া	িল/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিল"	সে	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	য়া	ইল/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুইল"		সে	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	ল/βX		ওয়া		"খাইল"	সে	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	নো	ইল/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইল"	সে	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	া	িলো/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিলো"	সে	        সাধু	past simple alt ???
SFX	v	য়া	ইলো/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুইলো"	সে	        সাধু	past simple alt ???
SFX	v	ওয়া	লো/βX	ওয়া		"খাইলো"	সে	        সাধু	past simple alt ???
SFX	v	নো	ইলো/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইলো"	সে	        সাধু	past simple alt ???
SFX	v	া	িলেন/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিলেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	য়া	ইলেন/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুইলেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	লেন/βX	ওয়া		"খাইলেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	নো	ইলেন/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইলেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	v	া	তাম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানতাম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	া	তুম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানতুম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond. আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	া	তেম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানতেম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond. আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	য়া	তাম/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুতাম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	য়া	তুম/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুতুম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond. আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	য়া	তেম/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুতেম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond. আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	তাম/αX	ওয়া		"খেতাম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	ওয়া	তুম/αX	ওয়া		"খেতুম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond. আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেম/αX	ওয়া		"খেতেম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond. আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	নো	তাম/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাতাম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	নো	তুম/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাতুম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond. আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	নো	তেম/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাতেম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond. আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	া	তিস/wX	[^য়]া	"জানতিস"	তুই	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	য়া	তিস/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুতিস"	তুই	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	ওয়া	তিস/αX	ওয়া		"খেতিস"	তুই	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	নো	তিস/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাতিস"	তুই	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	া	তি/wX		[^য়]া		"জানতি"	তুই	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	v	য়া	তি/xX	[^ও]য়া		"চুতি"		তুই	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	v	ওয়া	তি/αX	ওয়া			"খেতি"	তুই	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	v	নো	তি/ZX	নো			"ঘুমাতি"	তুই	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	v	া	তে/wXi	[^য়]া		"জানতে"	তুমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	য়া	তে/xXi	[^ও]য়া	"চুতে"		তুমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	ওয়া	তে/αXi	ওয়া		"খেতে"	তুমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	নো	তে/ZXi	নো		"ঘুমাতে"	তুমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	া	ত/wX		[^য়]া		"জানত"	সে	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	য়া	ত/xX		[^ও]য়া	"চুত"		সে	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	ওয়া	ত/αX		ওয়া		"খেত"		সে	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	নো	ত/ZX		নো		"ঘুমাত"	সে	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	v	া	তো/wX	[^য়]া		"জানতো"	সে	চলিত		past habitual/cond. alt ??????
SFX	v	য়া	তো/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুতো"	সে	চলিত		past habitual/cond. alt ??????
SFX	v	ওয়া	তো/αX	ওয়া		"খেতো"	সে	চলিত		past habitual/cond. alt ??????
SFX	v	নো	তো/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাতো"	সে	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	v	া	তেন/wX	[^য়]া		"জানতেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	য়া	তেন/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুতেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেন/αX	ওয়া		"খেতেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	নো	তেন/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাতেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	v	া	িতাম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিতাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	য়া	ইতাম/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	ওয়া	তাম/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	নো	ইতাম/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইতাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	া	িতিস/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিতিস"	তুই	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	য়া	ইতিস/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতিস"	তুই	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	ওয়া	তিস/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতিস"	তুই	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	নো	ইতিস/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইতিস"	তুই	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	া	িতে/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিতে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	য়া	ইতে/xXi	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	ওয়া	তে/βXi	ওয়া		"খাইতে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	নো	ইতে/OXi	নো		"ঘুমাইতে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	া	িত/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিত"	সে	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	য়া	ইত/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইত"	সে	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	ওয়া	ত/βX		ওয়া		"খাইত"	সে	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	নো	ইত/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইত"	সে	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	া	িতেন/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিতেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেন/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেন/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	নো	ইতেন/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	v	া	ছিলাম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছিলাম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	া	ছিলুম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছিলুম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	া	ছিলেম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছিলেম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছিলাম/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছিলাম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছিলুম/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছিলুম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছিলেম/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছিলেম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছিলাম/ζX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছিলাম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছিলুম/ζX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছিলুম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছিলেম/ζX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছিলেম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলাম/ηX	ওয়া		"রইছিলাম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলুম/ηX	ওয়া		"রইছিলুম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলেম/ηX	ওয়া		"রইছিলেম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছিলাম/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলাম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছিলুম/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলুম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছিলেম/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলেম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	া	ছিলি/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছিলি"	তুই	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছিলি/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছিলি"	তুই	চলিত		past continuous$
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছিলি/ζX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছিলি"	তুই	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলি/ηX	ওয়া		"রইছিলি"	তুই	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছিলি/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলি"	তুই	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	া	ছিলে/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছিলে"	তুমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছিলে/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছিলে"	তুমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছিলে/ζX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছিলে"	তুমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলে/ηX	ওয়া		"রইছিলে"	তুমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছিলে/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলে"	তুমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	া	ছিল/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছিল"	সে	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছিল/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছিল"	সে	চলিত		past continuous$
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছিল/ζX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছিল"	সে	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিল/ηX	ওয়া		"রইছিল"	সে	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছিল/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিল"	সে	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	া	ছিলেন/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছিলেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছিলেন/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছিলেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছিলেন/ζX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছিলেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলেন/ηX	ওয়া		"রইছিলেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছিলেন/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	v	া	িতেছিলাম/wX [^য়]া	"জানিতেছিলাম" আমি        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেছিলাম/xX [^ও]য়া	"চুইতেছিলাম"	আমি           সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেছিলাম/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতেছিলাম" আমি	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	নো	ইতেছিলাম/OX নো 		"ঘুমাইতেছিলাম" আমি        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	া	িতেছিলি/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিতেছিলি" তুই	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেছিলি/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতেছিলি"	তুই             সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেছিলি/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতেছিলি"	তুই	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	নো	ইতেছিলি/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছিলি" তুই 	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	া	িতেছিলে/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিতেছিলে" তুমি	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেছিলে/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতেছিলে"	তুমি            সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেছিলে/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতেছিলে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	নো	ইতেছিলে/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছিলে" তুমি	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	া	িতেছিল/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিতেছিল"	সে	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেছিল/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতেছিল"	সে              সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেছিল/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতেছিল"	সে	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	নো	ইতেছিল/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছিল" সে	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	া	িতেছিলেন/wX [^য়]া	"জানিতেছিলেন" তিনি        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেছিলেন/xX [^ও]য়া	"চুইতেছিলেন"   তিনি         সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেছিলেন/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতেছিলেন" তিনি	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	নো	ইতেছিলেন/OX নো 		"ঘুমাইতেছিলেন" তিনি      সাধু	past continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলাম/UX	ওয়া		"চাইছিলাম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous	vXtra
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলুম/UX	ওয়া		"চাইছিলুম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous	vXtra আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলেম/UX	ওয়া		"চাইছিলেম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous	vXtra আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলি/UX	ওয়া		"চাইছিলি"	তুই	চলিত		past continuous	vXtra
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলে/UX	ওয়া		"চাইছিলে"	তুমি	চলিত		past continuous	vXtra
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিল/UX	ওয়া		"চাইছিল"	সে	চলিত		past continuous	vXtra
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিলেন/UX	ওয়া		"চাইছিলেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past continuous	vXtra
SFX	v	া	েছি/lX	[^য়]া	"জেনেছি"	আমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	য়া	য়েছি/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুয়েছি"	আমি	চলিত		present perfect$
SFX	v	ওয়া	য়েছি/yX	ওয়া		"খেয়েছি"	আমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ানো	িয়েছি/OX	[^য়]ানো 	"ঘুমিয়েছি"	আমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ানো	িয়েছি/zX	[^ও]য়ানো 	"চুঁয়িয়েছি"	আমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ওয়ানো	ইয়েছি/xX	ওয়ানো		"খাইয়েছি"	আমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	া	েছিস/lX	[^য়]া	"জেনেছিস"	তুই	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	য়া	য়েছিস/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুয়েছিস"	আমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ওয়া	 য়েছিস/yX	ওয়া		"খেয়েছিস"	তুই	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ানো	িয়েছিস/OX	[^ওয়]ানো "ঘুমিয়েছিস"	তুই	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ওয়ানো	ইয়েছিস/xX	ওয়ানো		"খাইয়েছিস"	তুই	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	া	েছ/lX	[^য়]া	"জেনেছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	য়া	য়েছ/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুয়েছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ওয়া	য়েছ/yX	ওয়া		"খেয়েছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ানো	িয়েছ/OX	[^ওয়]ানো "ঘুমিয়েছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ওয়ানো  ইয়েছ/xX  ওয়ানো	"খাইয়েছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	া	েছে/lX	[^য়]া	"জেনেছে"	সে	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	য়া	য়েছে/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুয়েছে"	সে	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ওয়া	য়েছে/yX	ওয়া		"খেয়েছে"	সে	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ানো	িয়েছে/OX	[^ওয়]ানো "ঘুমিয়েছে"	সে	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ওয়ানো  ইয়েছে/xX ওয়ানো	"খাইয়েছে"	সে	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	া	েছেন/lX	[^য়]া	"জেনেছেন"  তিনি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	য়া	য়েছেন/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুয়েছেন"	তিনি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ওয়া	 য়েছেন/yX	ওয়া		"খেয়েছেন"	তিনি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	ানো	িয়েছেন/OX  [^ওয়]ানো "ঘুমিয়েছেন"  তিনি   চলিত 	present perfect
SFX	v	ওয়ানো  ইয়েছেন/xX  ওয়ানো	"খাইয়েছেন	তিনি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	v	া	িয়াছি/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিয়াছি"	আমি	        সাধু	present perfect
SFX	v	য়া	ইয়াছি/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইয়াছি"	আমি	        সাধু 	present perfect
SFX	v	ওয়া	য়াছি/βX	াওয়া		"খাইয়াছি"	আমি	        সাধু	present perfect
SFX	v	নো	ইয়াছি/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইয়াছি"	আমি	        সাধু	present perfect
